District of Columbia statutes.
19-603.06

Effect of registration in beneficiary form.

The designation of a TOD beneficiary on a registration in beneficiary form has no effect on ownership until the owner’s death. A registration of a security in beneficiary form may be canceled or changed at any time by the sole owner or all then surviving owners without the consent of the beneficiary.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 302(b), 48 DCR 2087

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 306 of the Uniform Nonprobate Transfers on Death Act (1991 Act).